Tennessee, session 114, SB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-412(a)(7)(B), is amended by
deleting the language "artwork, flag" and substituting "artwork, seal, flag".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1034
003100
- 1 -